Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF686.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1247YH (2) 91 je/js H.F. 686 Section 1. Section 10A.202, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. The department is responsible for the administration of 3 the laws of this state under chapters 88A , 88B , 89 , 89A , 90A , 4 91A , 91C , 91D , 91E , 91F, and 92 , and such other labor-services 5 duties assigned to the department or director. 6 Sec. 2. Section 10A.204, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 3. The director, in consultation with the labor 9 commissioner, shall, at the time provided by law, make an 10 annual report to the governor setting forth in appropriate 11 form the business and expense of the division and department 12 under this subchapter for the preceding year, the number 13 of remedial actions taken under chapter 89A , the number of 14 disputes or violations processed by the division or department 15 and the disposition of the disputes or violations, and other 16 matters pertaining to the division or department under this 17 subchapter which that are of public interest, together with 18 recommendations for change or amendment of the laws in this 19 chapter and chapters 88 , 88A , 88B , 89 , 89A , 89B , 90A , 91A , 91C , 20 91D , 91E , 91F, and 92 , and sections 85.67A and 85.68 , and the 21 recommendations, if any, shall be transmitted by the governor 22 to the first general assembly in session after the report is 23 filed. 24 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 91F.1 Definitions. 25 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 26 requires: 27 1. âChildâ means a biological, adopted, or foster child, 28 a stepchild, a legal ward, or a child of a person standing in 29 loco parentis, regardless of the childâs age or dependency 30 status. 31 2. âDirectorâ means the director of the department of 32 inspections, appeals, and licensing. 33 3. âEmployeeâ means a natural person employed for wages by 34 an employer in this state. 35 -1- LSB 1247YH (2) 91 je/js 1/ 4 H.F. 686 4. âEmployerâ means a person that employs for wages in this 1 state. 2 5. âHealth care providerâ means a physician or other health 3 care practitioner licensed in this or another state. 4 6. âHealth conditionâ means an illness, injury, impairment, 5 physical condition, or mental condition that requires 6 diagnosis, treatment, or care by a health care provider. 7 7. âMedical leaveâ means a leave from work taken by an 8 employee made necessary by a health condition of the employee 9 or a child, parent, or spouse of the employee. 10 8. âParentâ means a biological, adoptive, step, or foster 11 father or mother, or any other individual who stands in loco 12 parentis to an employee or who stood in loco parentis when the 13 employee was a child. 14 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 91F.2 Paid medical leave. 15 1. An employer shall provide an employee at least ten days 16 of paid medical leave per calendar year. 17 2. Payment for such leave shall be equal to the earnings 18 the employee would otherwise have received but for taking such 19 leave, calculated based on the length of the pay period in 20 which the employee is ordinarily compensated. 21 3. If the employeeâs earnings vary from pay period to 22 pay period, the payment shall be based on an average of the 23 employeeâs earnings in the three pay periods preceding such 24 leave. If the employeeâs earnings are not paid on a periodic 25 basis, the payment shall be based on the average earnings the 26 employee received in the previous three months. 27 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 91F.3 Employer rights. 28 1. An employer may require advance notice of leave taken 29 under section 91F.2 when taking such leave is reasonably 30 foreseeable. 31 2. An employer may require an employee to provide written 32 documentation from a health care provider, consistent with 33 applicable state and federal privacy laws, within one week of 34 an employee returning from leave under section 91F.2, that such 35 -2- LSB 1247YH (2) 91 je/js 2/ 4 H.F. 686 leave was taken due to a health condition. 1 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 91F.4 Enforcement ââ rules. 2 1. The director shall enforce this chapter. This chapter 3 shall be enforced pursuant to chapter 91A. 4 2. The director shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 5 17A to administer this chapter. Such rules may establish 6 additional procedures, requirements, and definitions necessary 7 to implement this chapter. 8